Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 5. Voting Machines and Tally Systems.

Sec. 15.20.900.
Optically scanned or electronically generated ballots.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, the director may adopt regulations that provide procedures for the tabulation of electronically generated ballots or optically scanned ballots, including procedures for

tests of the counting programs developed for each precinct tabulator to ensure that the system is functioning properly;

security for the voting and tabulation of ballots;

the transmission and accumulation of vote totals to assure the integrity of the vote counting process;

observation by the public of the counting process in the regional offices; and

the disposition of ballots.

The state ballot counting review board established under AS

15.10.180

shall test the counting programs for the tabulation of electronically generated ballots or optically scanned ballots and certify their accuracy in accordance with the regulations adopted under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 63 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 15.20.910.
Standards for voting machines and vote tally systems.

The director may approve a voting machine or vote tally system for use in an election in the state upon consideration of factors relevant to the administration of state elections, including whether the Federal Election Commission has certified the voting machine or vote tally system to be in compliance with the voting system standards approved by the Federal Election Commission as required by 42 U.S.C. 15481(a)(5) (Help America Vote Act of 2002). The director may only approve a voting machine or vote tally system if the machine or system satisfies the requirements of AS

15.15.032(c)

.

History.

(§ 23 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

This section refers to 42 U.S.C. 15481, which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 21081, by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.